Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [197.62] GRANTEE REPORTS. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 15, 2026, and each year thereafter, the commissioner of veterans affairs must submit a report on organizations that received grants from the agency in the preceding fiscal year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over veterans affairs policy and finance. new text end new text begin (b) The report required under paragraph (a) must include the following information for each grantee: new text end new text begin (1) a summary of the purpose of the grant; new text end new text begin (2) the grant amount provided to the grantee; new text end new text begin (3) the amount of previous grants issued by the commissioner to the grantee; new text end new text begin (4) the amount of other state and federal grants received by the grantee in the most recent fiscal year; new text end new text begin (5) the number of veterans and active service members served by the grantee; new text end new text begin (6) the number of family members of veterans and active service members served by the grantee; new text end new text begin (7) the number of veterans and veteran family members who successfully completed the grantee's programming and the criteria used to determine successful completion of the program; and new text end new text begin (8) the grantee's charitable giving ratio. new text end new text begin (c) If a grantee used grant money to provide services to any veterans or veteran family members who reside outside of Minnesota, the report must list the states where the non-Minnesota participants reside and include the reasons that the grantee used grant money to provide services to non-Minnesota residents. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner is not required to provide information in response to paragraph (b), clause (7), for a grantee that does not offer programming that requires completion or that cannot be measured by objective standards. new text end